Kentucky statutes. TITLE III Executive Branch
Penalties

15.990.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly or willfully makes any false or fraudulent statement or representation in any record, report, or application to the council, department, or other agency of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet under KRS

15.410

to

15.510

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days, or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 71, § 12; 1974, ch. 74, Art. V, § 35; 2007, ch. 85, § 36, effective June 26, 2007.

15.992.
Penalties.

Any person who knowingly violates any of the provisions of KRS

15.350

to

15.370

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 160, § 4.